apertium-eng.eng.dix
<pardef n="travel__vblex">
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng"><p><l>led</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng" w="1"><p><l>ling</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng" w="3"><p><l>ling</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng" w="2"><p><l>ling</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng"><p><l>led</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US"><p><l>ed</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US" w="1"><p><l>ing</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US" w="3"><p><l>ing</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US" w="2"><p><l>ing</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US"><p><l>ed</l>    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dwel/l__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng"><p><l>t</l>        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US"><p><l>led</l>   <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ling</l>      <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ling</l>      <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ling</l>      <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ls</l>        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng"><p><l>t</l>        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US"><p><l>led</l>   <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accept__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="liv/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="analy/se__vblex">
  <e v="eng"><p><l>se</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng"><p><l>se</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng"><p><l>sed</l>      <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng" w="1"><p><l>sing</l><r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng" w="3"><p><l>sing</l><r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng" w="2"><p><l>sing</l><r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng"><p><l>se</l>       <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng"><p><l>ses</l>      <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng"><p><l>sed</l>      <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US"><p><l>ze</l>    <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US"><p><l>ze</l>    <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US"><p><l>zed</l>   <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US" w="1"><p><l>zing</l><r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US" w="3"><p><l>zing</l><r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US" w="2"><p><l>zing</l><r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US"><p><l>ze</l>    <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US"><p><l>zes</l>   <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e v="eng_US"><p><l>zed</l>   <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="appl/y__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>       <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>       <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pa/y__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ys</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yed</l>       <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ab/ide__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ode</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ided</l>      <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>iding</l>     <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>iding</l>     <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>iding</l>     <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ides</l>      <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ode</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ided</l>      <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="backpedal">       <i>backpedal</i><par n="travel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bawl">            <i>bawl</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beatify">         <i>beatif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="behave arrrogantly"><i>behav</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/><p><l><b/>arrrogantly</l><r><g><b/>arrrogantly</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="brutalise">       <i>brutali</i><par n="analy/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="carry on">        <i>carr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="chart">           <i>chart</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="commercialise">   <i>commerciali</i><par n="analy/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="condone">         <i>condon</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="craft">           <i>craft</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="crucify">         <i>crucif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="demineralise">    <i>deminerali</i><par n="analy/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="depaginate">      <i>depaginat</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dignify">         <i>dignif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dissent">         <i>dissent</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="duel">            <i>duel</i><par n="travel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dwell">           <i>dwel</i><par n="dwel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="economise">       <i>economi</i><par n="analy/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="emancipate">      <i>emancipat</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="excel">           <i>excel</i><par n="travel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="father">          <i>father</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="formalise">       <i>formali</i><par n="analy/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fortify">         <i>fortif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fuel">            <i>fuel</i><par n="travel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fume">            <i>fum</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="group">           <i>group</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="immortalise">     <i>immortali</i><par n="analy/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inspire">         <i>inspir</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lay">             <i>la</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lay off">         <i>la</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="label">           <i>label</i><par n="travel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="levy">            <i>lev</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="localise">        <i>locali</i><par n="analy/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="monopolise">      <i>monopoli</i><par n="analy/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="muster">          <i>muster</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mute">            <i>mut</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="overlay">  <i>overla</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pay attention">   <i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>attention</l><r><g><b/>attention</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="pay back">        <i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="pay contributions"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>contributions</l><r><g><b/>contributions</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="pay in advance">  <i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in<b/>advance</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>advance</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="parody">          <i>parod</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pencil">          <i>pencil</i><par n="travel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="praise">          <i>prais</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="quarrel" v="eng_US"><i>quarrel</i><par n="travel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rationalise">     <i>rationali</i><par n="analy/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reapply">         <i>reappl</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="refrain">         <i>refrain</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reinstall">       <i>reinstall</i><par n="travel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="repay">           <i>repa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="say cheers">      <i>sa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>cheers</l><r><g><b/>cheers</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="scheme">          <i>schem</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spy">             <i>sp</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="squirm">          <i>squirm</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stray">           <i>stra</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sympathise">      <i>sympathi</i><par n="analy/se__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="travel">          <i>travel</i><par n="travel__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="travel together"> <i>travel</i><par n="travel__vblex"/><p><l><b/>together</l><r><g><b/>together</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="vary">            <i>var</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wilt">            <i>wilt</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wobble">          <i>wobbl</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
